src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON PROP_1E_VQYXX
NMN_1E_VQYXX ;
LEXICON PROP_1E_VQYXX
!: NMN_KAQLBB ;
NMN_1E_VQYXX ;

!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_JEAQNNN
!+Sem/Plc: NMN_JEAQNNN ;

!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_VUEAIQVV
!+Sem/Plc: NMN_VUEAIQVV ;


!LEXICON PROP_PIISSUZH !!= * @CODE@ piissuž:piiss
!: NMN_PIISSUZH ;

!LEXICON PROP_HOQPPI 
!: NMN_HOQPPI ;

LEXICON PROP_KYROE_sur
+Sem/Sur: NMN_RADIO ;

LEXICON PROP_JAEAEKK_mal
+Sem/Mal: NMN_JAEAEKK ;

LEXICON PROP_RADIO
: NMN_RADIO ;

LEXICON PROP_OULU
: NMN_OULU ;

LEXICON PROP_MEERSAZH
: NMN_MEERSAZH ;

LEXICON PROP_LOOBBYSHKH
NMN_LOOBBYSHKH ;
LEXICON PROP_KANEQL_plc
+Sem/Plc: PROP_KANEQL ;
LEXICON PROP_KANEQL
NMN_KANEQL ;
LEXICON PROP_UUQREZH_fem
+Sem/Fem: PROP_UUQREZH ;
LEXICON PROP_UUQREZH_mal
+Sem/Mal: PROP_UUQREZH ;
LEXICON PROP_UUQREZH
NMN_UUQREZH ;
LEXICON PROP_KUYLAZH_fem
 PROP_KUYLAZH ;
LEXICON PROP_KUYLAZH
: NMN_KUYLAZH ;

LEXICON PROP_MAINSTUMMUSH
 NMN_MAINSTUMMUSH ;
LEXICON PROP_AANAR_plc
+Sem/Plc: PROP_AANAR ;
LEXICON PROP_AANAR
: NMN_AANAR ;
!: SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;
!:^RmVow%>a SG-ILL ;
!:^RmVow%>e SG-LOC ;
!:^RmVow SG-COM_IN ;
!:^RmVow%>e ESS/PAR ;

! 
LEXICON PROP_SUYL_plc
+Sem/Plc: NMN_SUYL ;
LEXICON PROP_SUYL_PL_plc
+Sem/Plc: NMN_SUYL_PL ;

LEXICON PROP_TUYJJ_plc
+Sem/Plc: NMN_TUYJJ ;

!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_TUODDYR
!+Sem/Plc: NMN_TUODDYR ;

!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_AANAR
!+Sem/Plc: NMN_AANAR ;

!LEXICON PROP_SOAOABBAR
!: NMN_SOAOABBAR ;


LEXICON PROP_NIJDD
: NMN_NIJDD ;

LEXICON PROP_SIJDD
: NMN_SIJDD ;


!LEXICON PROP_SEM/PLC_SAJOS
!+Sem/Plc: NMN_SAJOS ;

LEXICON PROP_BIOLOGIA_plc
+Sem/Plc: PROP_BIOLOGIA ;
LEXICON PROP_BIOLOGIA_errorth
+Err/Orth: PROP_BIOLOGIA ;
LEXICON PROP_BIOLOGIA
: NMN_BIOLOGIA ;
+Err/Orth:^UltRmVowi NMN_ENERGII ;! 2025-06-14  
!LEXICON PROP_BUKVA
!: NMN_BUKVA ;
LEXICON PROP_TERHI_plc
+Sem/Plc: NMN_TERHI ;
LEXICON PROP_OULU_plc
+Sem/Plc: NMN_OULU ;
LEXICON PROP_MERJA_plc
+Sem/Plc: NMN_MERJA ;
LEXICON PROP_MERJA
: NMN_MERJA ;
LEXICON	PROP_JOUSTE_sur
+Sem/Sur: NMN_JOUSTE ;
LEXICON PROP_HYPPAE_sur
+Sem/Sur: NMN_MERJA ;
LEXICON PROP_TRUUBA-ani
+Sem/Ani: NMN_TRUUBA ;
LEXICON PROP_TRUUBA-fem
+Sem/Fem: NMN_TRUUBA ;
LEXICON PROP_TRUUBA-mal
+Sem/Mal: NMN_TRUUBA ;
LEXICON PROP_TRUUBA-obj
+Sem/Obj: NMN_TRUUBA ;
LEXICON PROP_TRUUBA-org
+Sem/Org: NMN_TRUUBA ;
LEXICON PROP_TRUUBA-plc
+Sem/Plc: NMN_TRUUBA ;
LEXICON PROP_TRUUBA-sur
+Sem/Sur: NMN_TRUUBA ;

LEXICON PROP_TRUUBA-femplc
+Sem/Fem: NMN_TRUUBA ;
+Sem/Plc: NMN_TRUUBA ;
LEXICON PROP_TRUUBA-femsur
+Sem/Fem: NMN_TRUUBA ;
+Sem/Sur: NMN_TRUUBA ;
LEXICON PROP_TRUUBA-malfem
+Sem/Mal: NMN_TRUUBA ;
+Sem/Fem: NMN_TRUUBA ;
LEXICON PROP_TRUUBA-malsur
+Sem/Mal: NMN_TRUUBA ;
+Sem/Sur: NMN_TRUUBA ;
LEXICON PROP_TRUUBA-objplc
+Sem/Obj: NMN_TRUUBA ;
+Sem/Plc: NMN_TRUUBA ;
LEXICON TEMPORARY
+Sem/Sur: NMN_TRUUBA ;
LEXICON FirstTag
+Sem/Sur: NMN_TRUUBA ;

LEXICON PROP_IN_A
: NMN_IN_A ;
LEXICON PROP_TRUUBA
: NMN_TRUUBA ;
LEXICON PROP_JOUSTE
: NMN_JOUSTE ;

LEXICON PROP_TERHI
: NMN_TERHI ;

LEXICON PROP_fem
+Sem/Fem: FOREIGNNAME_CASES ;
+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
LEXICON PROP_DIQLL_fem
+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom:^PAL ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Fem: NMN_DIQLL ;
LEXICON PROP_HOQPPI_fem
+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Fem: NMN_HOQPPI ;
LEXICON PROP_IILYSKH_fem
+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Fem: NMN_IILYSKH ;
LEXICON PROP_AANAR_fem
+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Fem: NMN_AANAR ;
LEXICON PROP_JIQLSSI_fem
+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom:i ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Fem: NMN_JIQLSSI ;
LEXICON PROP_PEQLLJ_fem
+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom:^PAL ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Fem: NMN_PEQLLJ ;

!LEXICON PROP_KUYLAZH_fem
!+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom:až ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
!+Sem/Fem: NMN_KUYLAZH ;

LEXICON PROP_1E_VQYXX_fem
+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom:^PAL ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Fem: NMN_1E_VQYXX ;
LEXICON PROP_NIJDD_fem
+Sem/Fem: NMN_NIJDD ;
LEXICON PROP_AACCIKH_fem
+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Fem: NMN_AACCIKH ;
LEXICON PROP_SINIDA_fem
+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Fem: NMN_SINIDA ;


LEXICON PROP_MEERSAZH_fem
+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom:až ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Fem: NMN_MEERSAZH ;
LEXICON PROP_SAQPPLI_fem
+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom:i ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Fem: NMN_SAQPPLI ;
LEXICON PROP_1E_VQCC_fem
+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom:^PAL ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Fem: NMN_1E_VQCC ;
LEXICON PROP_OAQLGA_fem
+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Fem: NMN_OAQLGA ;
!LEXICON PROP_AELDD_fem
!+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Fem: NMN_AELDD ;
LEXICON PROP_MERJA_fem
+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Fem: NMN_MERJA ;
LEXICON	 PROP_TERHI_fem
+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Fem: NMN_TERHI ;
LEXICON	PROP_JOUSTE_fem
+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Fem: NMN_JOUSTE ;
LEXICON PROP_OULU_fem
+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Fem: NMN_OULU ;
LEXICON PROP_RADIO_fem
+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-FEMALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Fem: NMN_RADIO ;


LEXICON FOREIGNNAME_CASES ! TODO: make good name comtlexes
! This is infuriating, of course, the best is to find the correct contlexes (Jaska 2026-06-04)
+Attr: # ;
+Sg+Nom: K ;
+Sg+Com:%>in K ;
+Sg+Loc:%>âst K ;
!+Sg+Ill:%>i K ;

LEXICON PROP_mal
+Sem/Mal: FOREIGNNAME_CASES ;
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;

LEXICON PROP_1Â_ATOM_mal
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_1Â_ATOM ;
LEXICON PROP_5Y_VS_VVZZ_mal
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_SAJOS ;
LEXICON PROP_DIQLL_mal
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom:^PAL ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_DIQLL ;
LEXICON PROP_UULLA_mal
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_UULLA ;
LEXICON PROP_PEYTTT_mal
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_PEYTTT ;
LEXICON PROP_AANAR_mal
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_AANAR ;
LEXICON PROP_PIETAR_mal
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_PIETAR ;

LEXICON PROP_JIQLSSI_mal
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom:i ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_JIQLSSI ;
LEXICON PROP_JUEQLGHGH_mal
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom:^PALE^PAL ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_JUEQLGHGH ;

!LEXICON PROP_SAIQMM_mal
!+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom:^PAL ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
!+Sem/Mal: NMN_SAIQMM ;
LEXICON PROP_1E_EUQKK_mal
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom:^PAL ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_1E_EUQKK ;
LEXICON PROP_KRIQLCC_mal
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom:^PAL ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_KRIQLCC ;
LEXICON PROP_KUYLAZH_mal
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom:až ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_KUYLAZH ;
LEXICON PROP_KOALVAK_mal
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_KOALVAK ;

LEXICON PROP_1E_UQKK_mal
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom:^PAL ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_1E_UQKK ;
LEXICON PROP_1E_VQYKK_mal
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom:^PAL ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_1E_VQYKK ;
LEXICON PROP_1E_VQYXX_mal
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom:^PAL ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_1E_VQYXX ;
LEXICON PROP_LUUBBYL_mal
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom:^Pen^V2VV ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_LUUBBYL ;

LEXICON PROP_MUORYZH_mal
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom:âž ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_MUORYZH ;
LEXICON PROP_MUORYZH_PL
: NMN_MUORYZH-WITH/WITHOUT-PAL_PL ;
LEXICON PROP_TOOBDYLM_mal !!= * @CODE@ toobdâlm:toobdâlm
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom:âž ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_TOOBDYLM ;

LEXICON PROP_1A_VWCC !!vuârr
 NMN_1A_VWCC ;

LEXICON PROP_PESS_mal
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_PESS ;
LEXICON PROP_PIISSUZH_mal
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom:už ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_PIISSUZH ;
!LEXICON PROP_PLAAN_mal
!+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
!+Sem/Mal: NMN_PLAAN ;
LEXICON PROP_1Â_VVK_mal
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_1Â_VVK ;
LEXICON PROP_AACCIKH_mal
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_AACCIKH ;
LEXICON PROP_1A_VYKK_PL_plc
+Sem/Plc: NMN_1A_VYKK_PL ;
LEXICON PROP_1Â_VYKK_mal
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_1Â_VYKK ;


LEXICON PROP_SOAOABBAR_mal
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom:^Pen^V2VV ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_SOAOABBAR ;
LEXICON PROP_MEERSAZH_mal
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom:až ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_MEERSAZH ;
LEXICON PROP_SAQPPLI_mal
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom:i ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_SAQPPLI ;
LEXICON PROP_1E_VQCC_mal
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom:^PAL ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_1E_VQCC ;
LEXICON PROP_OAQLGA_mal
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_OAQLGA ;

LEXICON PROP_MERJA_mal
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_MERJA ;
LEXICON	 PROP_TERHI_mal
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_TERHI ;
LEXICON	PROP_JOUSTE_mal
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_JOUSTE ;
LEXICON PROP_OULU_mal
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_OULU ;
LEXICON PROP_RADIO_mal
+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgNom: ATTESTED-MALE-STEM ;
+Sem/Mal: NMN_RADIO ;


!LEXICON PROP_sur
!+Sem/Sur: # ;

LEXICON PROP_1Â_VCC_sur
! This works for surnames in -off
+Sem/Sur: NMN_1Â_VCC ;

LEXICON PROP_1Â_ATOM_sur
! This works for surnames in -off
+Sem/Sur: NMN_1Â_ATOM ;

LEXICON PROP_MERJA_sur
+Sem/Sur: NMN_MERJA ;

LEXICON	PROP_TERHI_sur
+Sem/Sur: NMN_TERHI ;
